Tennessee, session 114, HB1941.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 3, Part 10, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
State funds, personnel, and other state resources shall not be obligated,
expended, or used to support any United States immigration and customs enforcement
activities in this state, including, but not limited to, conducting criminal investigations and
enforcing immigration laws.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1941
011580
- 1 -